Florida, session 2026, HB1097.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
33
34 Section 1. Subsection (7) of section 408.7057, Florida
35 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (8), subsection (5) is
36 amended, paragraph (i) is added to subsection (2), and a new
37 subsection (7) is added to that section, to read:
38 408.7057 Statewide provider and health plan claim dispute
39 resolution program.—
40 (2)
41 (i) A health plan must participate in a filed claim
42 dispute. Failure to respond as provided in paragraph (f) shall
43 result in a default against the health plan.
44 (5) The agency shall notify within 7 days the appropriate
45 licensure or certification entity whenever there is:
46 (a) A failure to pay as provided in subsection (7); or
47 (b) A violation of a final order issued by the agency
48 pursuant to this section.
49 (7) A health plan that does not prevail in the agency's
50 order shall pay the provider the amount provided in the order
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1097-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1097 2026
51 within 35 days after the order is entered. A health plan that
52 does not pay the required amount within the required timeframe
53 is subject to a penalty of up to $500 per day until the amount
54 is paid.
55 Section 2. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 409.967,
56 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (4) and (5),
57 respectively, paragraph (e) of present subsection (3) is
58 amended, paragraphs (p) and (q) are added to subsection (2), and
59 a new subsection (3) is added to that section, to read:
60 409.967 Managed care plan accountability.—
61 (2) The agency shall establish such contract requirements
62 as are necessary for the operation of the statewide managed care
63 program. In addition to any other provisions the agency may deem
64 necessary, the contract must require:
65 (p) Credentialing.—
66 1. A managed care plan shall determine whether it will
67 contract with a provider within 30 calendar days after receipt
68 of the verified credentialing information from a credentialing
69 verification organization either designated by the agency or
70 contracted by managed care organizations as part of a
71 credentialing alliance. Within 15 days after a contract is
72 executed, a managed care plan shall ensure that any internal
73 processing systems of the managed care plan have been updated to
74 include:
75 a. The accepted provider contract.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1097-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1097 2026
76 b. The provider as a participating provider.
77 2. For the purpose of reimbursement of claims, once a
78 provider has met the terms and conditions for credentialing and
79 enrollment, the provider's credentialing application date shall
80 be the date from which the provider's claims become eligible for
81 payment.
82 3. A managed care plan may not require a provider to
83 appeal or resubmit any clean claim submitted during the time
84 period between the provider's credentialing application date and
85 the completion of the credentialing process.
86 (q) Ownership interest or affiliation.—
87 1. Each managed care plan shall identify to the agency and
88 the Office of Insurance Regulation any ownership interest or
89 affiliation of any kind with any provider, provider group, or
90 company responsible for providing any pharmacy, diagnostics,
91 care coordination, care delivery, direct health care services,
92 administrative services, or financial services.
93 2. Each managed care plan shall also identify to the
94 agency and the Office of Insurance Regulation any ownership
95 affiliation of any kind with any entity which, either directly
96 or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries:
97 a. Has an investment or ownership interest of any kind
98 with any entity providing pharmacy, diagnostics, care
99 coordination, care delivery, direct health care services, or
100 administrative services;
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1097-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1097 2026
101 b. Shares common ownership with any entity providing
102 pharmacy, diagnostics, care coordination, care delivery, direct
103 health care services, or administrative services; or
104 c. Has an investor or a holder of an ownership interest of
105 any kind with any entity providing pharmacy, diagnostics, care
106 coordination, care delivery, direct health care services, or
107 administrative services.
108 (3) Each managed care plan shall report any change in
109 information in subsection (2) to the agency and the Office of
110 Insurance Regulation in writing within 60 days after the change
111 occurs.
112 (4)(3) ACHIEVED SAVINGS REBATE.—
113 (e) Once the certified public accountant completes the
114 audit, the certified public accountant shall submit an audit
115 report to the agency attesting to the achieved savings of the
116 plan. The agency shall review the report to determine compliance
117 with the requirements of this subsection. The agency shall
118 notify the certified public accountant of any deficiencies in
119 the audit report. The certified public accountant must correct
120 such deficiencies in the audit report and resubmit the revised
121 audit report to the agency before the report is considered
122 final. Once finalized, the results of the audit report are
123 dispositive.
124 Section 3. Subsection (7) is added to section 409.975,
125 Florida Statutes, to read:
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1097-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1097 2026
126 409.975 Managed care plan accountability.—In addition to
127 the requirements of s. 409.967, plans and providers
128 participating in the managed medical assistance program shall
129 comply with the requirements of this section.
130 (7) PROVIDER NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENT.—Each managed care
131 contract with a provider must include provider notifications
132 regarding denials of coverage in accordance with ss.
133 627.6131(22) and 641.315(15).
134 Section 4. Subsection (22) is added to section 627.6131,
135 Florida Statutes, to read:
136 627.6131 Payment of claims.—
137 (22) For circumstances in subparagraph (21)(a)1. and sub-
138 subparagraphs (21)(a)5.d. and e., an insurer may not deny a
139 claim of a previously authorized health care service unless the
140 insurer has notified both the insured and the treating provider
141 of the insured's change in coverage status or applicable benefit
142 limitation. Notification to the provider must be issued
143 contemporaneously with the notice required to be given to the
144 insured under this section. Failure to provide such notification
145 shall preclude the insurer from denying payment for the
146 authorized service.
147 Section 5. Subsection (15) is added to section 641.315,
148 Florida Statutes, to read:
149 641.315 Provider contracts.—
150 (15) For circumstances in subparagraph (14)(a)1. and sub-
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1097-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1097 2026
151 subparagraphs (14)(a)5.d. and e., an insurer may not deny a
152 claim of a previously authorized health care service unless the
153 insurer has notified both the insured and the treating provider
154 of the insured's change in coverage status or applicable benefit
155 limitation. Notification to the provider must be issued
156 contemporaneously with the notice required to be given to the
157 insured under this section. Failure to provide such notification
158 shall preclude the insurer from denying payment for the
159 authorized service.
160 Section 6. Paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of section
161 409.973, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
162 409.973 Benefits.—
163 (5) PROVISION OF DENTAL SERVICES.—
164 (b) In the event the Legislature takes no action before
165 July 1, 2017, with respect to the report findings required under
166 paragraph (a), the agency shall implement a statewide Medicaid
167 prepaid dental health program for children and adults with a
168 choice of at least two licensed dental managed care providers
169 who must have substantial experience in providing dental care to
170 Medicaid enrollees and children eligible for medical assistance
171 under Title XXI of the Social Security Act and who meet all
172 agency standards and requirements. To qualify as a provider
173 under the prepaid dental health program, the entity must be
174 licensed as a prepaid limited health service organization under
175 part I of chapter 636 or as a health maintenance organization
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1097-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1097 2026
176 under part I of chapter 641. The contracts for program providers
177 shall be awarded through a competitive procurement process.
178 Beginning with the contract procurement process initiated during
179 the 2023 calendar year, the contracts must be for 6 years and
180 may not be renewed; however, the agency may extend the term of a
181 plan contract to cover delays during a transition to a new plan
182 provider. The agency shall include in the contracts a medical
183 loss ratio provision consistent with s. 409.967(5) s.
184 409.967(4). The agency is authorized to seek any necessary state
185 plan amendment or federal waiver to commence enrollment in the
186 Medicaid prepaid dental health program no later than March 1,
187 2019. The agency shall extend until December 31, 2024, the term
188 of existing plan contracts awarded pursuant to the invitation to
189 negotiate published in October 2017.
190 Section 7. Paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of section
191 409.9855, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
192 409.9855 Pilot program for individuals with developmental
193 disabilities.—
194 (5) PAYMENT.—
195 (c) The revenues and expenditures of the selected plan
196 which are associated with the implementation of the pilot
197 program must be included in the reporting and regulatory
198 requirements established in s. 409.967(4) s. 409.967(3).
199 Section 8. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1097-00